Arkansas, session 2025, HB1061.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-77-148(b), concerning coverage for
continuous glucose monitors under the Arkansas Medicaid Program, is amended
to read as follows:
(b) The Arkansas Medicaid Program shall provide coverage for a
continuous glucose monitor for the treatment of an individual if the
individual has:
(1) Either:
(A) A presence of type 1 diabetes or any other type of
diabetes with:
(i) The use of insulin more than two (2) times
daily; or
(ii) Evidence of Level 2 or Level 3 hypoglycemia; or
(B) Diagnosis of glycogen storage disease type 1a; or
(C) Diagnosis of gestational diabetes; and
*JMB001*
12/10/2024 11:30:51 AM JMB001

HB1061
(2) Regular follow-up visits with a healthcare provider at a
minimum of every six (6) months to assess for ongoing benefit of the
continuous glucose monitor.

































12/10/2024 11:30:51 AM